Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1194.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Autologous and Direct Allogeneic Blood Transfusion Act.Section 2. Purpose of act.The purpose of this act is to reduce or eliminate the need for allogeneic blood transfusions, thereby avoiding risks associated with receiving someone else's blood, such as transfusion reactions or the potential transmission of infectious diseases.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Autologous blood transfusion." The process by which an individual donates the individual's own blood solely for the individual's own future use, typically before the scheduled time for a medical procedure."Direct allogeneic blood transfusions." Donation of blood or its components for the purpose of transfusion into a specified individual."Health care facility." An institution providing health care services. The term includes a hospital, clinic or other inpatient center, outpatient facility or diagnostic or treatment center that is licensed by the Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Medical procedure." Medical interventions designed to alleviate, manage or cure various health conditions and diseases.Section 4. Autologous blood transfusions and direct allogeneic blood transfusions.A health care facility shall allow an individual on whom a medical procedure is to be performed at the health care facility an autologous blood transfusion or direct allogeneic blood transfusion for the medical procedure if, not less than 72 hours before the scheduled time for the medical procedure, the individual:(1) notifies the health care facility of the intention to provide an autologous blood transfusion or receive a direct allogeneic blood transfusion; and(2) for a direct allogeneic blood transfusion, provides a list of eligible blood donors.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1194PN1467 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930